Connecticut, session 2026, HB05252.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Auditors of Public Accounts, in
2 conjunction with the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management,
3 shall conduct a review of the existing system of funding for providing
4 residential and day programs, including work programs, to individuals
5 with intellectual disabilities who are clients of the Department of
6 Developmental Services and receive twenty-four-hour residential
7 services, both public and private. As part of such review, the auditors
8 and secretary shall (1) compare the costs of private providers providing
9 such residential and day programs versus those provided by the state
10 and determine the factors that impact such difference in costs, (2)
11 examine the costs of providing such residential and day programs to
12 such clients based upon their level of need, (3) assess the quality of care
13 of such services in a sampling of twenty-four-hour residential settings,
HB5252 / File No. 318 1

HB5252 File No. 318
14 both public and private, and (4) recommend the most cost-effective,
15 quality-driven system for providing residential care for such clients. Not
16 later than February 15, 2027, the auditors shall submit a report, in
17 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
18 with the results of such review to the joint standing committee of the
19 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to government
20 oversight.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
GOS Joint Favorable
HB5252 / File No. 318 2

HB5252 File No. 318
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Auditors GF - Cost 50,000 to None
100,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Auditors of Public Accounts (APA), in
conjunction with the Office of Policy and Management, to review the
costs of providing certain public and private services to individuals with
intellectual disabilities resulting in a cost to the state. To meet the
requirements of the bill, the APA will have to hire a consultant to
conduct the review and produce the report resulting in a one-time cost
in FY 27 of $50,000 to $100,000. The exact cost is dependent on responses
to the RFP.
The Out Years
None.
HB5252 / File No. 318 3

HB5252 File No. 318
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5252
AN ACT REQUIRING THE AUDITORS OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS AND
OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT TO REVIEW THE COSTS
OF PROVIDING CERTAIN PUBLIC AND PRIVATE SERVICES TO
INDIVIDUALS WITH INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES.